District of Columbia statutes.
28-3816

Inconsistent laws: What law governs.

If any provision of law or regulation promulgated thereunder is inconsistent with this chapter, this chapter shall govern, unless this chapter or the inconsistent provision of the other laws specifically provides otherwise.

Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 678, Pub. L. 92-200, § 4

History

1981 Ed., § 28-3816.
1973 Ed., § 28-3816.

Prior Codifications